South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4246.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 6-35-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 6-35-30. A county or municipality, only with the approval of the owners of all real property situated within a proposed district, as further provided in Section 6-35-118, may exercise the powers and provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a government entity may create a district which includes a geographic area or areas within the jurisdiction and authority of another government entity and may exercise the powers and provisions of this chapter within such geographic area or areas with the consent, expressed by resolution, of the governing body of that other government entity. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----